Utah statutes.
63J-1-212.   Duplicate payment of claims prohibited.

No claim against the state, the payment of which is provided for, shall be duplicated, and the amount of any appropriation for the payment of any such claim shall be withheld if it is covered by any other appropriation.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 183, 2009 General Session

